Wisconsin, session 2025, SB867.
do enact as follows:SB867,11Section 1. 23.097 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 23.097 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:SB867,2,3323.097 (1) (intro.) In this section, a “nonprofit:SB867,2,64(a) “Nonprofit organization” means an organization that is described in 5section 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that is exempt from federal 6income tax under section 501 (a) of the Internal Revenue Code.SB867,27Section 2. 23.097 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB867,2,9823.097 (1) (b) “Urban heat island” means an urban or metropolitan area that 9is significantly warmer than the surrounding natural land cover.SB867,310Section 3. 23.097 (1g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB867,2,161123.097 (1g) The department shall award grants to counties, cities, villages, 12towns, and nonprofit organizations, and federally recognized American Indian 13tribes or bands located in this state for up to 50 percent of the cost of tree 14management plans, tree inventories, brush residue projects, the development of 15tree management ordinances, tree disease evaluations, public education concerning 16trees in urban areas and other tree projects.SB867,417Section 4. 23.097 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB867,3,41823.097 (1m) The department shall award grants to counties, cities, villages, 19towns, nonprofit organizations, and federally recognized American Indian tribes or 1bands located in this state to cover the costs of planting, maintaining, and removing 2and replacing trees in urban and metropolitan areas to reduce the negative effects 3of urban heat islands. Grants under this subsection may not exceed $100,000 and 4may be made for the full amount of the costs of an eligible project.SB867,55Section 5. 23.097 (1r) of the statutes is amended to read:SB867,3,17623.097 (1r) In addition to the grants awarded under sub. subs. (1g) and (1m), 7the department may award grants to counties, cities, village, towns, nonprofit 8organizations, and federally recognized American Indian tribes or bands located in 9this state that apply for the grants for the costs of removing, saving, and replacing 10trees that have been damaged by catastrophic storm events in urban areas. To be 11eligible for a grant under this subsection, the damage must have occurred in an 12area for which the governor has designated a state of emergency due to a 13catastrophic storm event. The department shall notify each applicant for a grant 14under this subsection as to whether the application for the grant will be approved or 15denied within 60 days after the date the application is submitted to the 16department. A recipient of a grant awarded under this subsection is exempt from 17having to pay any percentage of the costs in order to receive the grant.SB867,618Section 6. Nonstatutory provisions.SB867,4,819(1) Emergency rules. Using the procedure under s. 227.24, the department 20of natural resources may promulgate emergency rules to implement s. 23.097 (1m) 21for the period before the effective date of any permanent rules promulgated under s. 2223.097 (1m) but not to exceed the period authorized under s. 227.24 (1) (c), subject 23to extension under s. 227.24 (2). Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (a), (2) (b), and (3), 1the department is not required to provide evidence that promulgating a rule under 2this subsection as an emergency rule is necessary for the preservation of the public 3peace, health, safety, or welfare and is not required to provide a finding of 4emergency for a rule promulgated under this subsection. Notwithstanding s. 5227.24 (1) (e) 1d., the department is not required to prepare a statement of scope of 6the rules promulgated under this subsection. Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (e) 1g., 7the department is not required to present the rules promulgated under this 8subsection to the governor for approval.SB867,79Section 7. Fiscal changes.SB867,4,1310(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 11of natural resources under s. 20.370 (5) (az), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-1226 is increased by $500,000 to provide grants under s. 23.097 (1m) relating to urban 13heat islands.SB867,4,1414